Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-734.01
Textbook contracts; requirements for publisher or manufacturer.

(1) On and after January 1, 2003, all contracts for the purchase of textbooks for school districts and educational service units shall require the publisher or manufacturer to provide to the school district or educational service unit, at no cost, (a) computer files or other electronic versions of each textbook title purchased and (b) the right to transcribe, reproduce, modify, and distribute each textbook title purchased in braille, large print if the publisher or manufacturer does not offer a large-print edition, or other specialized accessible media exclusively for use by students in the same school district or educational service unit who are blind or visually impaired.

(2) The contract shall also provide that: (a) Within thirty days after receiving a request from a school district or educational service unit, the publisher or manufacturer shall provide computer files or other electronic versions of each textbook title purchased to such school district or educational service unit; (b) the computer files or other electronic version shall maintain the structural integrity of the standard instructional materials, be compatible with commonly used braille translation and speech synthesis software, and include corrections and revisions as may be necessary; (c) if the technology is not available to convert a math, science, or other nonliterary textbook into the format prescribed in this section, the publisher or manufacturer shall not be required to provide computer files or other electronic versions of the textbook; and (d) upon the willful failure of the publisher or manufacturer to comply with the requirements of the contract pursuant to this section, the publisher or manufacturer shall reimburse the school district or educational service unit for the cost of creating such computer files or electronic versions.

Laws 2002, LB 647, § 1.